Idaho, session 2025, S1022.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 90, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-9004, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-9004. MEDICAL RIGHTS. (1) This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Idaho Bill of Patient Medical Rights."
(2) The state, a political subdivision of the state, or a public health
district cannot:
(a) Order Idaho residents in general to remain at home, close busi-
nesses, social distance, or wear masks or other facial coverings be-
cause of an emergency, extreme emergency, or medical emergency, whether
declared or undeclared; or
(b) Advertise via any medium, electronic or otherwise, for the recom-
mended public use of any vaccine, drug, or medication classified as ex-
perimental by a competent medical authority or approved under a United
States food and drug administration emergency use authorization.
(3) A patient cannot be denied treatment for refusing a vaccine or other
medication.
(4) A patient has the right to emergency treatment.
(5) A patient cannot be refused treatment based on sex, age, race, na-
tional origin, ethnicity, religion, or veteran or military status.
(6) A patient has the right to informed consent and must be provided
with sufficient information with respect to vaccines, medications, and med-
ical treatment in plain and understandable language prior to being asked for
consent to take or receive such vaccines, medications, or treatment.
(7) No patient shall be administered any vaccine or experimental drug
or medication by any health care practitioner unless the patient or the pa-
tient's legally designated representative provides signed informed written
consent to the use of such vaccine or experimental drug or medication.
(8) A patient has the right to refuse treatment.
(9) A patient has the right to choose the patient's health care
providers.
(10) A patient has the right to privacy and to decide what personal med-
ical information will be released and when and to whom such information will
be released.


(11) A patient has the right to a fair review or appeal of any complaint
against a physician, hospital, or other health care provider.
(12) A patient may not be prohibited from bringing a legal cause of ac-
tion against a health care provider by the state or a political subdivision
of the state.
(13) A health care provider licensed or certified by the state of Idaho
shall not receive or accept funding, privileges, or benefits from a govern-
ment entity in return for violating a provision of this section.
(14) A patient shall, when possible, be given the opportunity to desig-
nate a person or persons who will be kept informed of the patient's condi-
tion, prescribed or recommended medications, and options with respect to ap-
plicable and available medical procedures.
(15) Visitation by a patient's family members or legal guardians shall
be allowed unless the patient refuses visitation or visitation is expressly
denied by the attending physician for sound medical reasons in the best in-
terest of the patient. General denial of visitation by family members or le-
gal guardians shall not be instituted as a matter of administrative policy.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-9004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-9004 39-9005. ENFORCEMENT. (1) No public official, employee, or
agent of the state of Idaho or any of its political subdivisions, shall act
to impose, collect, enforce, or effectuate any penalty in the state of Idaho
that violates the public policy set forth in section 39-9003(2), Idaho Code.
(2) The attorney general shall take such action as is provided in sec-
tion 67-1401(15), Idaho Code, in the defense or prosecution of rights pro-
tected under this act chapter.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.